Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202646-514
Chief Water Officer, defined.

For purposes of the Reclamation Act, Chief Water Officer means the Chief Water Officer of the Department of Water, Energy, and Environment.

Laws 1947, c. 173, § 2(12), p. 526;

Laws 2000, LB 900, § 166;

Laws 2025, LB317, § 151.